Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.330

Use of wood products—Compliance with chapter 39.35D RCW.

For purposes of determining compliance with chapter 39.35D RCW, the department of enterprise services shall credit the project for using wood products with a credible third party sustainable forest certification or from forests regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act.

[ 2015 c 225 s 37; 2005 c 12 s 11.]

NOTES: